Georgia, session 2025_26, HB751.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 7 of Chapter 4 of Title 49 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
medical assistance generally, is amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"49-4-142.6.
The department shall be authorized to submit a waiver request, on or before September 30,
2025, to the United States Department of Health and Human Services Centers for Medicare
and Medicaid Services pursuant to Section 1115 of the federal Social Security Act, which
includes childcare and caregiving as qualifying activities. For purposes of this Code
section, the term 'childcare' means full-time or part-time work by a parent caring for a child
H. B. 751
- 1 -

LC 57 0236
or children, in their own residence; and the term 'caregiving' means full-time or part-time
work by a family member caring for an adult child with a disability or an aging parent.
Further, upon approval of the waiver, the department shall be authorized to take all
necessary steps to implement the terms and conditions of the waiver."
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
without such approval.
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 751
- 2 -